Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1175.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3 of the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Charitable use." The use of property for the advancement of a charitable purpose, including:(1) the relief of poverty;12345678910111213141516171819 (2) the advancement and provision of education, including postsecondary education;(3) the advancement of religion; and(4) the prevention and treatment of disease or injury.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Land use regulation limited.(a) Prohibition.--A municipality may not impose or implement a land use regulation in a manner that regulates charitable uses related to a person's free exercise of religion within the existing buildings, facilities and capacities of a place of regularly established public worship or essential to carrying out the charitable uses, unless:(1) the regulation is necessary to protect a compelling governmental interest in the health, safety or welfare of the community; and(2) the protection of health, safety and welfare cannot be achieved through less restrictive means.(b) Defense.--Notwithstanding section 5, a person may assert a violation of this section as a defense in a judicial or administrative proceeding.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1175PN1312 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122